District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.06

Release in District.

All inmates of the Workhouse and Reformatory for the District of Columbia shall be returned to and released in said District on the day of the expiration of sentence.

History

June 10, 1910, 36 Stat. 464, ch. 282

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-406.
1973 Ed., § 24-406.